Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 57
COLORADO BEEF COUNCIL

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 20 of chapter 8, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were amended with relocations in 1993, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1993, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

35-57-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Beef Council Authority Act".

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1848, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The former § 35-57-101 was relocated to § 35-57-102 in 1993.

35-57-102. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that owners of cattle shall be authorized and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with handlers, processors, dealers, and purchasers of cattle in promoting and stimulating, by research, education, advertising, and other methods, the increased and efficient production, distribution, use, and sale of cattle and beef products; and it is the intent and purpose of this article to authorize and provide a method and procedure for a promotional program for the cattle industry and the financing thereof pursuant to the powers of the general assembly as authorized by law. It is further declared that the cattle industry of this state is affected with a public interest in that, among other things:

The production, processing, handling, purchasing, manufacturing, and distributing of beef and beef products constitutes a paramount industry of this state which not only provides substantial and required revenues for the state and its political subdivisions and employment and a means of livelihood for many thousands of its population but also furnishes essential foods that are vital to the public health and welfare.

Stabilization, maintenance, and expansion of the cattle industry of Colorado and of the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for its products are necessary to assure the consuming public an adequate supply of foods which are indispensable in a proper human diet, to protect, for the state and its political subdivisions, a necessary source of tax revenue, to provide and maintain an adequate standard of living for a great segment of the population of this state, to maintain proper wage scales for those engaged in the cattle industry, and to maintain existing employment.

The essentiality of beef and beef products in proper human nutrition and to the maintenance of a high level of public health is such as to require that the public be made thoroughly aware thereof and be protected against misrepresentation and deception by the dissemination of accurate and scientific information relative to the healthful qualities of beef and beef products, their various classifications, the food values, and industrial and medicinal uses thereof; the methods, care, and precautions necessary to their proper production, processing, manufacture, and distribution; the necessary costs and expenses thereof; and the necessity and desirability on the part of the public of using and consuming beef and beef products of the highest standards of quality.

The purposes of this article are:

To enable the cattle industry, with the aid of the state, to protect their right to market, to develop, maintain, and expand the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for beef and beef products produced, processed, or manufactured in this state, and the use and the consumption of such beef and beef products therein;

In aid, but not in limitation, of the purpose in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), to authorize and enable the board to formulate and effectuate, directly or in cooperation with other agencies and instrumentalities specified in this article, sales stimulation and consumer or other educational programs designed to increase the use and consumption of beef and beef products;

To provide funds for the administration and enforcement of this article by contributions or fees in the event the federal cattlemen's beef promotion and research board, established in 7 U.S.C. sec. 2904 (1), ceases to exist. Such moneys shall be collected in the manner prescribed in this article.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1848, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2)(c) amended, p. 516, § 1, effective May 12.

L. 2003:

(2)(c) amended, p. 1046, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-101 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-102 was relocated to § 35-57-105.

35-57-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means the Colorado beef council authority created by section 35-57-104 (1).

"Board" or "beef board" or "beef council" means the board of the Colorado beef council authority created by section 35-57-104 (1).

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1849, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The former § 35-57-103 was relocated to § 35-57-106 in 1993.

35-57-104. Colorado beef council authority - creation.

There is hereby created the Colorado beef council authority, which shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state. The authority shall not be an agency of state government, nor shall it be subject to administrative direction by any state agency except:

As provided in this article;

For purposes of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.;

For purposes of inclusion in the risk management fund and the self-insured property fund and by the department of personnel pursuant to part 15 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1849, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1543, § 136, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

The former § 35-57-104 was relocated to § 35-57-107 in 1993.

35-57-105. Colorado beef council authority - board of directors.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in the board of directors of the Colorado beef council authority, which shall be composed of:

Two persons who raise, breed, or grow cattle or calves for beef production;

Two persons who are actively engaged in the business of feeding cattle and operating a feedlot;

Two persons actively engaged in the processing, slaughtering, handling, or marketing of beef;

One person engaged in the production, on a dairy farm, of fluid milk and the selling of dairy cattle for beef;

One person actively engaged in the processing and distribution of beef or beef products.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board. In making such appointments, the governor shall take into consideration nominations and recommendations made to the governor by organizations who represent, or who are engaged in, the same type of production or business as the person so nominated or recommended for appointment as a member of the board. Each member shall continue in office until such member's successor is appointed and qualified. The terms of no two members from the same industry shall expire on the same year.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1850, § 1, effective July 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1850, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-102 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-105 was relocated to § 35-57-108.

35-57-106. Qualifications of members.

Each member of the board shall have the following qualifications which shall continue during the member's term of office:

Each shall be a citizen of the United States.

Each shall be a bona fide resident of the state of Colorado.

Each shall demonstrate through membership in a producers' organization, or an organization representing this type of production or business, or public service or otherwise, an active interest in the development of the beef industry of Colorado.

Each shall be actively engaged in the type of production or business which the member will represent on the board for a period of at least five years and shall derive a substantial proportion of such member's income from that type of production or business. Each shall be a contributor to the Colorado beef board.

No more than one-half of the board shall be affiliated with one political party.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1850, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-103 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-106 was relocated to § 35-57-109.

35-57-107. Terms of members.

The members of the Colorado beef board who are in office on July 1, 1993, shall comprise the original board of the beef council authority, and their initial terms on the beef council authority shall end at the same time as the terms to which they were appointed on the Colorado beef board prior to July 1, 1993.

On the expiration of the term of a member of the board, that member's successor shall be appointed by the governor for a term of four years; except that, in case of a vacancy, the governor shall appoint a person who shall serve for the unexpired term.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1851, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-104 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-107 was relocated to § 35-57-110.

35-57-108. Declaring office of member vacant.

The governor shall immediately declare the office of any member of the board vacant whenever the governor finds that: The member no longer is actively engaged in the type of beef or dairy production or business the member was engaged in at the time of the member's appointment; the member has become a resident of another state; the member is unable to perform the duties of the office.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1851, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-105 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-108 was relocated to § 35-57-111.

35-57-109. Removal of member.

The governor may remove any member of the board for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office or when the segment of the industry which the member represents fails or elects not to pay its equitable share relating to the promotion of beef. Such member shall be entitled to a public hearing after serving upon such member, ten days before the hearing, a copy of the charges against the member, together with the notice of the time and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the member shall be given an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel and shall be permitted to present evidence to answer the charges and explain the facts alleged.

In every case of removal, the governor shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete statement of all charges against the member, and the governor's findings thereon, together with a record of the entire proceedings had in connection therewith.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1851, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-106 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-109 was relocated to § 35-57-112.

35-57-110. Expenses of members.

Members, officers, and employees of the board may receive their actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. The board shall adopt uniform and reasonable regulations governing the incurring and paying of such expenses.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1852, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-107 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-110 was relocated to § 35-57-113.

35-57-111. Meeting place.

The board shall establish a meeting place anywhere within this state, but the selection of the location shall be guided by consideration for the convenience of the majority of those most likely to have business with the board or to be affected by its acts.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1852, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-108 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-111 was relocated to § 35-57-114.

35-57-112. Meetings.

The board shall elect a chairperson from among its members and a secretary-treasurer who may or may not be from among its members. It shall adopt a general statement of policy for guidance. The board shall meet regularly once each six months and at such other times as called by the chairperson. The chairperson may call special meetings at any time and shall call a special meeting when requested by four or more members of the board.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1852, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-109 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-112 was relocated to § 35-57-115.

35-57-113. Duties and powers of the board.

The board may:

Conduct or contract for scientific research to discover and develop the commercial value of beef and beef products;

Disseminate reliable information founded upon the research undertaken under this article, showing the uses or probable uses of beef and its products;

Study state and federal legislation with respect to tariffs, duties, reciprocal trade agreements, import quotas, and other matters concerning the beef industry;

Sue and be sued as a board, without individual liability, for acts of the board within the scope of the powers conferred upon it by this article;

Enter into contracts which it deems appropriate to carry out the purposes of the board as authorized by this article;

Borrow money, not in excess of its estimate of its revenue from the current year's contributions;

Make grants to research agencies for financing special or emergency studies or for the purchase or acquisition of facilities necessary to carry out the purposes of the board as authorized by this article;

Appoint subordinate officers and employees of the board and prescribe their duties and fix their compensation;

Cooperate with any local, state, or nationwide organization or agency engaged in work or activities similar to that of the board, and enter into contracts with such organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs;

Act jointly and in cooperation with the federal government or any agency thereof in the administration of any program of the government or of a governmental agency deemed by the board as beneficial to the beef industry of this state, and expend funds in connection therewith if that program is compatible with the powers conferred by this article;

Adopt, rescind, modify, or amend all proper regulations, orders, and resolutions for the exercise of its powers and duties;

Enter into contracts for the promotion of beef and develop new markets through such promotion;

Receive and hold funds for and on behalf of the national beef promotion and research board as a qualified state beef council pursuant to the beef promotion and research order, 7 CFR 1260.172.

The board's powers and duties, as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, and its activities pursuant to this article are consistent with those of a qualified state beef council pursuant to 7 CFR 1260.172 to 1260.181.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1852, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) added, p. 517, § 3, effective May 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-110 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-113 was relocated to § 35-57-116.

35-57-114. Acceptance of grants and gifts.

The board may accept grants, donations, contributions, or gifts from any source for expenditures for any purpose consistent with the powers conferred on the board.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1853, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-111 as it existed prior to 1993.

35-57-115. Payments to national organizations.

From the contributions it receives, the board may pay or contribute to organizations such as, but not limited to, the national livestock and meat board to carry out work and programs approved by the board on a national basis.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1853, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-112 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-115 was relocated to § 35-57-117.

35-57-116. Rules and regulations.

The board is authorized to promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1853, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-113 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-116 was relocated to § 35-57-118.

Cross references:

For rule-making procedures, see article 4 of title 24.

35-57-117. Collection of fees for purposes of this article - custody and disbursement.

In order for the board to carry out the provisions and intent of this article, the state board of stock inspection commissioners, by and through the brand commissioner, shall collect a beef board fee on cattle and calves that are sold for which a brand inspection fee is also collected as provided in section 35-41-104 (5). Commencing July 1, 1993, the fee shall not exceed one dollar per head or the amount assessed pursuant to the beef promotion and research order, 7 CFR 1260.172, as amended, whichever is greater.

The fee set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall also be collected from any producer marketing cattle of that producer's own production in the form of beef or beef products to consumers, either directly or through retail or wholesale outlets, or for export purposes, and such producer shall remit to the brand commissioner the set fee per head of cattle or the equivalent thereof.

The fee assessed on each head of cattle sold pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall not apply to cattle owned by a person if such person:

Certifies that the person's only share in the proceeds of a sale of cattle, beef, or beef product is a sales commission, handling fee, or other service fee;

Certifies that the person acquired ownership of the cattle to facilitate the transfer of ownership of such cattle from the seller to a third party;

Establishes that such cattle were resold not later than ten days after the date on which the person acquired ownership.

The beef board fee collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be kept separate and distinct from other moneys collected by the state board of stock inspection commissioners. At least once each two months, such fee shall be transferred or paid over to the board, less a sum not in excess of three percent per head on each animal for which a fee is collected.

The board shall utilize the moneys collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section in carrying out the purposes of this article. In carrying out the purposes of this article, the board may coordinate its activities with any state agency and may allocate such sums collected under this section as are necessary for such coordination.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1853, § 1, effective July 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1853, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 516, § 2, effective May 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-115 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-117 was relocated to § 35-57-119.

Cross references:

For the brand inspection fee, see § 35-53-101.

35-57-118. Collection procedure.

The operators of all stockyards, slaughterhouses, packing plants, and livestock auction markets shall deduct from the proceeds of sale owed by them to the respective owners of animals the beef board fee as authorized by section 35-57-117.

When an operator sends or gives any written statement to an owner or such owner's agent relating to the proceeds owing such owner, the operator shall include a statement of the amount deducted from such proceeds for board purposes under section 35-57-117 and the amount deducted from such proceeds under article 53 of this title for brand inspection.

In accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, operators shall promptly pay to the state board of stock inspection commissioners all beef board fees collected by them.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1854, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 517, § 4, effective May 12.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-116 as it existed prior to 1993, and the former § 35-57-118 was relocated to § 35-57-120.

35-57-119. Refunds.

Any person who paid a beef board fee at the time of the brand inspection as required by section 35-57-117 shall be entitled to an eighty-five percent refund of such fee. A claim for a refund shall be made to the board of directors of the Colorado beef council authority, hereinafter referred to as the "board", within ten days after the date of the brand inspection.

Only the person who paid the fee shall submit a claim for a refund to the board. A written and signed request for a refund of such fee and a copy of the Colorado brand inspection certificate shall be required for such refund. A person may submit a claim by facsimile or by mail. The postmark date or the facsimile confirmation date shall be used to determine the timeliness of a claim.

The board, before processing or making a refund, may require any additional information or verification it deems necessary to determine the validity of the claim for such refund. All persons who forward claims for such refunds shall keep pertinent records for a period of at least three years and shall make such records available to the board upon request. The board may file an action to recover a refund of a fee from any person who has obtained such refund illegally.

Any person who files a fraudulent or false claim for a refund, or who by any false pretenses obtains or attempts to obtain a refund not legally due to such person, or who signs a refund claim in the name of and for another person commits theft, as defined in section 18-4-401, C.R.S., and shall be punished according to law.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1854, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 518, § 5, effective May 12.

L. 2003:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 1046, § 2, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-117 as it existed prior to 1993.

35-57-120. Payment of board money to authorized agent - deposits and withdrawals.

Any person authorized by the board to receive or disburse funds as provided in this article shall post with the board surety bond in an amount the board determines sufficient, the cost or premium to be paid by the board.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1855, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-57-118 as it existed prior to 1993.